Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 32
EMPLOYEES

Section

40-32-101. Working hours of trainmen. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 01:

p. 233, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 5515.

C.L.

§ 2895.

CSA:

C. 139, § 81.

CRS 53:

§ 116-13-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-13-1.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 219, § 11, effective March 29.

40-32-102. Violation - penalty. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 01:

p. 233, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 5516.

C.L.

§ 2896.

CSA:

C. 139, § 82.

CRS 53:

§ 116-13-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-13-2.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 219, § 11, effective March 29.

40-32-103. Telegraph operators - qualifications. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 280, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 5517.

C.L.

§ 2897.

CSA:

C. 139, § 83.

CRS 53:

§ 116-13-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-13-3.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 564, § 27, effective April 24.

40-32-104. Violation - penalty. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 280, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 5518.

C.L.

§ 2898.

CSA:

C. 139, § 84.

CRS 53:

§ 116-13-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-13-4.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 564, § 28, effective April 24.

40-32-104.5. Railroad peace officer - defined - scope of authority - responsibility and liability of railroad.

As used in this section, "railroad peace officer" means any person who is employed by a class I railroad corporation operating within the state of Colorado to protect and investigate offenses against the railroad corporation.

A class I railroad corporation may employ a railroad peace officer to protect and investigate offenses against the corporation. Such railroad peace officer, while engaged in the conduct of his or her employment, shall possess and exercise all the powers vested in a peace officer of this state, pursuant to sections 16-2.5-101 and 16-2.5-142, C.R.S. Such authority shall be exercised only in the protection of persons, including on-duty employees, who are located on the class I railroad corporation's property and in the protection of all real and personal property in the current physical possession of such railroad corporation. Such authority may include engaging in immediate pursuit. In the exercise of his or her duties, the railroad peace officer shall have the power to arrest for violation of laws upon railroad property; except that he or she shall be required to notify the appropriate local law enforcement agency before applying for any warrant or lodging any criminal complaint unless the arrest is pursuant to section 40-32-107.

The class I railroad corporation employing the railroad peace officer shall be solely responsible for any liability resulting from acts or omissions of the railroad peace officer which arise within the scope and course of his employment.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 1489, § 2, effective April 30.

L. 2000:

(2) amended, p. 219, § 12, effective March 29.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 1627, § 55, effective August 6.

40-32-105. Conductors to have police powers. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 13:

p. 436, § 1.

C.L.

§ 2899.

CSA:

C. 139, § 85.

CRS 53:

§ 116-13-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-13-5.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 219, § 11, effective March 29.

40-32-106. Eject disorderly passengers.

When any passenger is guilty of disorderly conduct, or uses any obscene language to the annoyance and vexation of passengers and refuses to desist therefrom when requested by the conductor, the conductor is authorized to stop the train at any station and eject such passenger from the train, using only such force as may be necessary, and may command the assistance of the employees of the railroad company to assist in such removal; but nothing in this section shall relieve any railroad company from liability for damages to any passenger for an unwarranted exercise of such power by any such conductor.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 436, § 2.

C.L.

§ 2900.

CSA:

C. 139, § 86.

CRS 53:

§ 116-13-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-13-6.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 219, § 13, effective March 29.

40-32-107. Arrest and take before county court.

When any passenger is guilty of any crime or misdemeanor upon any train, a railroad peace officer of such train may arrest such passenger, take such passenger before any county court in any county in which such crime or misdemeanor was committed, and file a complaint charging such passenger with such crime or misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 437, § 3.

C.L.

§ 2901.

CSA:

C. 139, § 87.

CRS 53:

§ 116-13-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-13-7.

L. 64:

p. 307, § 268.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 220, § 14, effective March 29.

40-32-108. Duties of commission.

The commission shall establish standards for the employment of railroad peace officers relating to education or experience in law enforcement.

Source:

L. 57:

p. 606, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 116-13-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-13-8.

L. 87:

(2) added, p. 1490, § 3, effective April 30.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 220, § 15, effective March 29.

40-32-109. Compliance. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 57:

p. 606, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 116-13-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-13-9.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 219, § 11, effective March 29.

40-32-110. Complaint - hearing. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 57:

p. 607, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 116-13-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-13-10.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 219, § 11, effective March 29.

40-32-111. Order. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 57:

p. 607, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 116-13-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-13-11.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 219, § 11, effective March 29.

40-32-112. Penalty. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 57:

p. 607, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 116-13-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-13-12.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 219, § 11, effective March 29.

40-32-113. Extension of time. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 57:

p. 607, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 116-13-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-13-13.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 219, § 11, effective March 29.